Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.120

Costs where deposit in court is made and rejected.

If the defendant in any action pending, shall at any time deposit with the clerk of the court, for the plaintiff, the amount which he or she admits to be due, together with all costs that have accrued, and notify the plaintiff thereof, and such plaintiff shall refuse to accept the same in discharge of the action, and shall not afterwards recover a larger amount than that deposited with the clerk, exclusive of interest and cost, he or she shall pay all costs that may accrue from the time such money was so deposited.

[ 2011 c 336 s 125; Code 1881 s 517; 1877 p 110 s 521; 1854 p 203 s 379; RRS s 486.]

NOTES:

Conflicting claims, deposit in court, costs: RCW 4.08.170.